Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.745

Incentive payments.

Using funds specifically appropriated for this purpose, and funds provided by private foundations or other private sector entities, the director may provide incentive payments to participating employers that enroll in the marketplace.

[ 2015 c 296 s 7.]